Odia_apertium_morph_dict.dix
<pardef n="dAkwar/a__n">
<e><p><l>ANIti</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANItA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIte</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:te"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANItie</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tie"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANItAe</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANI</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANImAne</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANImAnafku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANImAnafka</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANImAnafkara</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANItiku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANItira</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIra</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIgudika</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIgudikara</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIgudifku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIgudiku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIfka</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIfku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIgudA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIgudZika</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIgudZikara</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIgudZifku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIgudZiku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>ANIgudZA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
T
<pardef n="anX/a__n">
<e><p><l>uNIti</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNItA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tA"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIte</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:te"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNItie</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tie"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNItAe</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:tAe"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNI</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNImAne</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNImAnafku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNImAnafka</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNImAnafkara</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNItiku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ku"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNItira</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:ti"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIra</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIgudika</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIgudikara</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIgudifku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIgudiku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIgudZika</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIgudZikara</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:ra"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIgudZifku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIgudZiku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIfka</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:s"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIfku</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIgudA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>uNIgudZA</l><r><s n="cat:n"/><s n="prsg:0"/><s n="gen:f"/><s n="num:p"/><s n="det:0"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="dAkwarANI"><i>dAkwar</i><par n="dAkwar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="cAkaraANI"><i>cAkar</i><par n="dAkwar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="mAlikANI"><i>mAlik</i><par n="dAkwar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="bAbuANI"><i>bAbu</i><par n="dAkwar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="TAkurANI"><i>TAkur</i><par n="dAkwar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="mARtrANI"><i>mARtr</i><par n="dAkwar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="sAAnwANI"><i>sAAnw</i><par n="dAkwar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="ruxrANI"><i>ruxr</i><par n="dAkwar/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="anXuNI"><i>anX</i><par n="anX/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="camAruNI"><i>camAr</i><par n="anX/a__n"/></e>
<e lm="gaXuNI"><i>gaX</i><par n="anX/a__n"/></e>
